Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1084
Class I, II, or III school district; school board; budget; tax; levy; publication of expenditures; violation; penalty; duty of county board.

The school board of a Class I, II, or III school district shall annually, on or before September 30, report in writing to the county board and, for years prior to 2017, the learning community coordinating council if the school district is a member of a learning community the entire revenue raised by taxation and all other sources and received by the school board for the previous school fiscal year and a budget for the ensuing school fiscal year broken down generally as follows: (1) The amount of funds required for the support of the schools during the ensuing school fiscal year; (2) the amount of funds required for the purchase of school sites; (3) the amount of funds required for the erection of school buildings; (4) the amount of funds required for the payment of interest upon all bonds issued for school purposes; and (5) the amount of funds required for the creation of a sinking fund for the payment of such indebtedness. The secretary shall publish, within ten days after the filing of such budget, a copy of the fund summary pages of the budget one time at the legal rate prescribed for the publication of legal notices in a legal newspaper published in and of general circulation in such city or village or, if none is published in such city or village, in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the city or village. The secretary of the school board failing or neglecting to comply with this section shall be deemed guilty of a Class V misdemeanor and, in the discretion of the court, the judgment of conviction may provide for the removal from office of such secretary for such failure or neglect. For Class I, II, or III school districts that are not members of a learning community, the county board shall levy and collect such taxes as are necessary to provide the amount of revenue from property taxes as indicated by all the data contained in the budget and the certificate prescribed by this section, at the time and in the manner provided in section 77-1601.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision XIV, § 23, p. 385;

Laws 1885, c. 80, § 1, p. 329;

Laws 1893, c. 31, § 2, p. 358;

R.S.1913, § 6670;

C.S.1922, § 6604;

C.S.1929, § 79-2522;

R.S.1943, § 79-2527;

Laws 1947, c. 292, § 1, p. 904;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 243, p. 771;

Laws 1959, c. 404, § 1, p. 1366;

Laws 1972, LB 1070, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 42;

Laws 1988, LB 1193, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 51;

Laws 1995, LB 452, § 32;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-810;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 730;

Laws 1997, LB 710, § 22;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 43;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 98;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 35;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 51;

Laws 2021, LB644, § 24;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 75.
July 19, 2024
For legal rate for publications, see section 33-141.

Act creating Court of Industrial Relations is not amendatory of this section. Orleans Education Assn. v. School Dist. of Orleans, 193 Neb. 675, 229 N.W.2d 172 (1975).

Class III school district did not have authority to enter into a lease-purchase agreement of a school building. Haschke v. School Dist. of Humphrey, 184 Neb. 298, 167 N.W.2d 79 (1969).

Power of a Class III school district to raise money for general school purposes is set forth in this section. State ex rel. School Dist. of City of Grand Island v. Board of Equalization, 166 Neb. 785, 90 N.W.2d 421 (1958).